California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) Each licensee shall report to the board each and every change of name within 30 days after each change, giving both the old and new names.

(d) Each applicant and licensee shall have an electronic mail address and shall report to the board that electronic mail address no later than July 1, 2022. The electronic mail address shall be considered confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 5.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

The directory shall be prima facie evidence of the authority of the persons named therein to practice under this act, unless such authority has been revoked, suspended, or otherwise limited pursuant to this chapter subsequent to the publication of the directory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2023.5.

(a) The board, in conjunction with the Board of Registered Nursing, and in consultation with the Physician Assistant Board and professionals in the field, shall review issues and problems surrounding the use of laser or intense light pulse devices for elective cosmetic procedures by physicians and surgeons, nurses, and physician assistants. The review shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The appropriate level of physician supervision needed.

(2) The appropriate level of training to ensure competency.

(3) Guidelines for standardized
 procedures and protocols that address, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Patient selection.

(B) Patient education, instruction, and informed consent.

(C) Use of topical agents.

(D) Procedures to be followed in the event of complications or side effects from the treatment.

(E) Procedures governing emergency and urgent care situations.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify the prohibition against the unlicensed practice of medicine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 9.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2024.

(a) The board may select and contract with necessary medical consultants who are licensed physicians and surgeons to assist it in its programs. Subject to Section 19130 of the Government Code, the board may contract with these consultants on a sole source basis.

(b) Every consultant retained under this section for a given investigation of a licensee shall be a specialist, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 984, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2024.5.

(a) The board shall establish a Complainant Liaison Unit comprised of board staff responsible for the following:

(1) Respond to communications from the public about the complaint review and enforcement process.

(2) After a complaint has been referred to a field investigation, assist with coordinating communications between the complainant and investigators, as necessary.

(3) Following a disciplinary decision, respond to questions from the complainant regarding any appeals process available to the disciplined licensee.

(4) Conduct and support public
 outreach activities to improve the public’s understanding of the board’s enforcement process, including related laws and policies.

(5) Evaluate and respond to requests from complainants to review a complaint closure that the complainant believes was made in error.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the board requires additional staff positions to implement this section. Therefore, this section shall only become operative six months following the allocation of positions to the board for the implementation of these provisions in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 6.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2025.

The board through its regular mailing shall notify all licensees of the existence of pain management guidelines published by the Agency for Health Care Policy and Research of the Public Health Service within the United States Department of Health and Human Services, and shall provide the published guidelines to licensees upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 949, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2026.

The board shall initiate the process of adopting regulations on or before January 1, 2019, to require its licentiates and registrants to provide notice to their clients or patients that the practitioner is licensed or registered in this state by the board, that the practitioner’s license can be checked, and that complaints against the practitioner can be made through the board’s Internet Web site or by contacting the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 20.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2027.

(a) The board shall post on its Internet Web site the following information on the current status of the license for all current and former licensees:

(1) Whether or not the licensee is presently in good standing.

(2) Current American Board of Medical Specialties certification or board equivalent as certified by the board.

(3) Any of the following enforcement actions or proceedings to which the licensee is actively subjected:

(A) Temporary restraining orders.

(B) Interim suspension orders.

(C) Revocations, suspensions, probations, or limitations on practice ordered by the board or the board of another state or jurisdiction, including those made part of a probationary order or stipulated agreement.

(D) Current accusations filed by the Attorney General, including those accusations that are on appeal. For purposes of this paragraph, “current accusation” means an accusation that has not been dismissed, withdrawn, or settled, and has not been finally decided upon by an administrative law judge and the board unless an appeal of that decision is pending.

(E) Citations issued that have not been resolved or appealed within
 30 days.

(b) The board shall post on its Internet Web site all of the following historical information in its possession, custody, or control regarding all current and former licensees:

(1) Approved postgraduate training.

(2) Any final revocations and suspensions, or other equivalent actions, taken against the licensee by the board or the board of another state or jurisdiction or the surrender of a license by the licensee in relation to a disciplinary action or investigation, including the operative accusation resulting in the license surrender or discipline by the board.

(3) Probation or other equivalent action ordered by the board, or the board of another
 state or jurisdiction, completed or terminated, including the operative accusation resulting in the discipline by the board.

(4) Any felony convictions. Upon receipt of a certified copy of an expungement order granted pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code from a licensee, the board shall, within six months of receipt of the expungement order, post notification of the expungement order and the date thereof on its Internet Web site.

(5) Misdemeanor convictions resulting in a disciplinary action or accusation that is not subsequently withdrawn or dismissed. Upon receipt of a certified copy of an expungement order granted pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code from a licensee, the board shall, within six months of receipt of the expungement order, post notification of
 the expungement order and the date thereof on its Internet Web site.

(6) Civil judgments issued in any amount, whether or not vacated by a settlement after entry of the judgment, that were not reversed on appeal, and arbitration awards issued in any amount, for a claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by the physician and surgeon’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by his or her rendering of unauthorized professional services.

(7) Except as provided in subparagraphs (A) and (B), a summary of any final hospital disciplinary actions that resulted in the termination or revocation of a licensee's hospital staff privileges for a medical disciplinary cause or reason. The posting shall provide any additional explanatory or exculpatory information submitted
 by the licensee pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 805. The board shall also post on its Internet Web site a factsheet that explains and provides information on the reporting requirements under Section 805.

(A) If a licensee’s hospital staff privileges are restored and the licensee notifies the board of the restoration, the information pertaining to the termination or revocation of those privileges shall
 remain posted on the Internet Web site for a period of 10 years from the restoration date of the privileges, and at the end of that period shall be removed.

(B) If a court finds, in a final judgment, that peer review resulting in a hospital disciplinary action was conducted in bad faith and the licensee notifies the board of that finding, the information concerning that hospital disciplinary action posted on the Internet Web site shall be immediately removed. For purposes of this subparagraph, “peer review” has the same meaning as defined in Section 805.

(8) Public letters of reprimand issued within the past 10 years by the board or the board of another state or jurisdiction, including the operative accusation, if any, resulting in discipline by the board.

(9) Citations issued within the last three years that have been resolved by payment of the administrative fine or compliance with the order of abatement.

(10) All settlements within the last five years in the possession, custody, or control of the board shall be disclosed for a licensee in the low-risk category if there are three or more settlements for that licensee within the last five years, and for a licensee in the high-risk category if there are four or more settlements for that licensee within the last five years. Classification of a licensee in either a “high-risk category” or a “low-risk” category depends upon the specialty or subspecialty practiced by the licensee and the designation assigned to that specialty or subspecialty by the board pursuant to subdivision (f) of
 Section 803.1.

(A) For the purposes of this paragraph, “settlement” means a settlement in an amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more of any claim or action for damages for death or personal injury caused by the physician and surgeon’s negligence, error, or omission in practice, or by his or her rendering of unauthorized professional services.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “settlement” does not include a settlement by a licensee, regardless of the amount paid, when (i) the settlement is made as a part of the settlement of a class claim, (ii) the amount paid in settlement of the class claim is the same amount paid by the other licensees in the same class or similarly situated licensees in the same class, and (iii) the settlement was paid in the context of a
 case for which the complaint that alleged class liability on behalf of the licensee also alleged a products liability class action cause of action.

(C) The board shall not disclose the actual dollar amount of a settlement, but shall disclose settlement information in the same manner and with the same disclosures required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 803.1.

(11) Appropriate disclaimers and explanatory statements to accompany the information described in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, including an explanation of what types of information are not disclosed. These disclaimers and statements shall be developed by the board and shall be adopted by regulation.

(c) The board shall
 provide links to other Internet Web sites that provide information on board certifications that meet the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 651. The board may also provide links to any other Internet Web sites that provide information on the affiliations of licensed physicians and surgeons. The board may provide links to other Internet Web sites on the Internet that provide information on health care service plans, health insurers, hospitals, or other facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   (AB 1886)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2028.5.

(a) The board may establish a pilot program to expand the practice of telehealth in this state.

(b) To implement this pilot program, the board may convene a working group of interested parties from the public and private sectors, including, but not limited to, state health-related agencies, health care providers, health plan administrators, information technology groups, and groups representing health care consumers.

(c) The purpose of the pilot program shall be to develop methods, using a telehealth model, to deliver throughout the state health care to persons with chronic diseases as well as
 information on the best practices for chronic disease management services and techniques and other health care information as deemed appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [2030. - 2042.]

2030.

The provisions of this chapter insofar as they are substantially the same as provisions relating to the same subject matter of previous medical practice acts shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2031.

The rights given by any certificate issued under any preceding medical practice act are not affected by the enactment of this chapter, nor by the repeal of any law upon which such rights are based, but such rights shall hereafter be exercised according to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other organization, or any combination thereof, except that only natural persons shall be licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2033.

“Professional” relates to the art and science of medicine and surgery and to such other arts and sciences as may be included within the field of medicine and surgery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2034.

“Medical licensing authority” refers to any officer, board, commission, or department of another state upon whose certificate a reciprocity certificate may be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2036.

Whenever a course of instruction is required for any certificate, it shall be satisfied by a resident course of medical instruction. Whenever a resident course of instruction is mentioned in this chapter, it shall be interpreted to mean classroom, laboratory, practical, and clinical instruction, received and given the person physically present, wherever prescribed as a part of his or her instruction and for the period prescribed for such instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2037.

Whenever any requirement is provided for any certificate relating to a medical school or hospital, or any reference is made to a medical school or hospital, the medical school and hospital shall be ones approved by the Division of Licensing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2038.

Whenever the words “diagnose” or “diagnosis” are used in this chapter, they include any undertaking by any method, device, or procedure whatsoever, and whether gratuitous or not, to ascertain or establish whether a person is suffering from any physical or mental disorder. Such terms shall also include the taking of a person’s blood pressure and the use of mechanical devices or machines for the purpose of making a diagnosis and representing to such person any conclusion regarding his or her physical or mental condition. Machines or mechanical devices for measuring or ascertaining height or weight are excluded from this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2039.

All certificates issued by the board shall state the extent and character of the practice which is permitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2040.

The terms “license” and “certificate” as used in this chapter are deemed to be synonomous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2041.

The term “licensee” as used in this chapter means the holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate or doctor of podiatric medicine’s certificate, as the case may be, who is engaged in the professional practice authorized by the certificate under the jurisdiction of the appropriate board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 678, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2042.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Medical Board of California and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall require each applicant to furnish to the board a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting criminal history record checks. The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to the board pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the fingerprints and response required by this section. The applicant shall be responsible for this
 cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. License Required and Exemptions [2050. - 2078.]

2050.

The Division of Licensing shall issue one form of certificate to all physicians and surgeons licensed by the board which shall be designated as a “physician’s and surgeon’s certificate.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.

The physician’s and surgeon’s certificate authorizes the holder to use drugs or devices in or upon human beings and to sever or penetrate the tissues of human beings and to use any and all other methods in the treatment of diseases, injuries, deformities, and other physical and mental conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 146, any person who practices or attempts to practice, or who advertises or holds himself or herself out as practicing, any system or mode of treating the sick or afflicted in this state, or who diagnoses, treats, operates for, or prescribes for any ailment, blemish, deformity, disease, disfigurement, disorder, injury, or other physical or mental condition of any person, without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, or unsuspended certificate as provided in this chapter or without being authorized to perform the act pursuant to a certificate obtained in accordance with some other provision of law is guilty of a public offense, punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment
 pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both the fine and either imprisonment.

(b) Any person who conspires with or aids or abets another to commit any act described in subdivision (a) is guilty of a public offense, subject to the punishment described in that subdivision.

(c) The remedy provided in this section shall not preclude any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 11.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Eligible patient” means a person who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Has an immediately life-threatening disease or condition as defined in Section 111548.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Has given written informed consent for, or, if the person lacks the capacity to consent, their legally authorized representative has given written informed consent on their behalf for, both of the following:

(i) The use of an eligible out-of-state physician and surgeon’s telehealth health care services.

(ii) The release of certified medical records to their primary physician and surgeon by the out-of-state physician.

(C) Has not been accepted to participate in the clinical trial nearest to their home for the immediately life-threatening disease or condition identified in subparagraph (A) within one week of completion of the clinical trial application process, or, in the medical judgment of a physician and surgeon described in paragraph (3), it is unreasonable for the patient to participate in that clinical trial due to the patient’s current condition and stage of disease.

(D) Has documentation from their primary
 physician and surgeon attesting that they meet the requirements in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C). The primary physician and surgeon may withdraw the documentation if there is a substantial change in the patient’s mental capacity to make informed decisions for their own care unless their legally authorized representative has given written informed consent on their behalf.

(2) “Eligible out-of-state physician and surgeon” means a person who is licensed as a physician and surgeon in another state in good standing with no history of prior discipline, and whose medical expertise is that of the eligible patient’s illness.

(3) “Primary physician and surgeon” means a physician and surgeon licensed under the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000))
 or an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the Osteopathic Act (Article 21 (commencing with Section 2450)).

(4) “Telehealth” has the same meaning as provided in Section 2290.5.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, an eligible out-of-state physician and surgeon may practice medicine in the state if the practice is limited to delivering health care via telehealth to an eligible patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 837, Sec. 2.   (AB 1369)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who complies with the requirements of Section 2053.6 shall not be in violation of Section 2051 or 2052 unless that person does any of the following:

(1) Conducts surgery or any other procedure on another person that punctures the skin or harmfully invades the body.

(2) Administers or prescribes X-ray radiation to another person.

(3) Prescribes or administers legend drugs or controlled substances to another person.

(4) Recommends the discontinuance of legend drugs or controlled substances prescribed by an appropriately licensed practitioner.

(5) Willfully diagnoses and treats a physical or mental condition of any person under circumstances or conditions that cause or create a risk of great bodily harm, serious physical or mental illness, or death.

(6) Sets fractures.

(7) Treats lacerations or abrasions through electrotherapy.

(8) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises, or implies to a client or prospective client that he or she is a physician, a surgeon, or a physician and surgeon.

(b) A person who advertises any services that are not unlawful under Section 2051 or 2052 pursuant to subdivision (a) shall disclose in the advertisement that he or she is not licensed by the state as a healing arts practitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.6.

(a) A person who provides services pursuant to Section 2053.5 that are not unlawful under Section 2051 or 2052 shall, prior to providing those services, do the following:

(1) Disclose to the client in a written statement using plain language the following information:

(A) That he or she is not a licensed physician.

(B) That the treatment is alternative or complementary to healing arts services licensed by the state.

(C) That the services to be provided are not licensed by the state.

(D) The nature of the services to be provided.

(E) The theory of treatment upon which the services are based.

(F) His or her educational, training, experience, and other qualifications regarding the services to be provided.

(2) Obtain a written acknowledgment from the client stating that he or she has been provided with the information described in paragraph (1). The client shall be provided with a copy of the written acknowledgement, which shall be maintained by the person providing the service for three years.

(b) The information required by subdivision (a) shall be provided in a language that the client understands.

(c) Nothing in this section or in Section 2053.5 shall be construed to do the following:

(1) Affect the scope of practice of licensed physicians and surgeons.

(2) Limit the right of any person to seek relief for negligence or any other civil remedy against a person providing services subject to the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2054.

(a) Any person who uses in any sign, business card, or letterhead, or, in an advertisement, the words “doctor” or “physician,” the letters or prefix “Dr.,” the initials “M.D.” or “D.O.,” or any other terms or letters indicating or implying that the person is a physician and surgeon, physician, surgeon, or practitioner under the terms of this or any other law, or that the person is entitled to practice hereunder, or who represents or holds themselves out as a physician and surgeon, physician, surgeon, or practitioner under the terms of this or any other law, without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended certificate as a physician and surgeon under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor. No person shall use the words
 “doctor” or “physician,” the letters or prefix “Dr.,” the initials “M.D.” or “D.O.,” or any other terms or letters indicating or implying that the person is a physician and surgeon, physician, surgeon, or practitioner in a health care setting that would lead a reasonable patient to determine that person is a licensed “M.D.” or “D.O.”

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any of the following persons may use the words “doctor” or “physician,” the letters or prefix “Dr.,” or the initials “M.D.” or “D.O.”:

(1) A graduate of a medical or an osteopathic medical school approved or recognized by the medical or osteopathic medical board while enrolled in a postgraduate training program approved by the board.

(2) A graduate
 of a medical or an osteopathic medical school who does not have a certificate as a physician and surgeon under this chapter if the individual meets all of the following requirements:

(A) If issued a license to practice medicine in any jurisdiction, has not had that license revoked or suspended by that jurisdiction.

(B) Does not otherwise hold themselves out as a physician and surgeon entitled to practice medicine in this state except to the extent authorized by this chapter.

(C) Does not engage in any of the acts prohibited by Section 2060.

(3) A person authorized to practice medicine under Section 2111 or 2113 subject to the limitations set forth in those
 sections.

(4) A person holding a current and active license under this division or any initiative act referred to in this division, to the extent the use of the title is consistent with the act governing the practice of that license.

(5) A person whose use of the word “doctor” or the prefix “Dr.” is not associated with any claim of entitlement to practice medicine or any other professional service for which the use of the title would be untrue or misleading pursuant to Section 17500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 7.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person issued a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate by the Medical Board of California pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to use of the initials “M.D.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 886, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

(a) The purpose of this section is to provide protection against retaliation for physicians who advocate for medically appropriate health care for their patients pursuant to Wickline v. State of California 192 Cal. App. 3d 1630.

(b) It is the public policy of the State of California that a physician and surgeon be encouraged to advocate for medically appropriate health care for his or her patients. For purposes of this section, “to advocate for medically appropriate health care” means to appeal a payor’s decision to deny payment for a service pursuant to the reasonable grievance or appeal procedure established by a medical group, independent practice association, preferred provider organization, foundation, hospital medical staff and governing body, or payer, or to protest a decision, policy, or practice that the physician, consistent with that degree of learning and skill ordinarily possessed by reputable physicians practicing according to the applicable legal standard of care, reasonably believes impairs the physician’s ability to provide medically appropriate health care to his or her patients.

(c) The application and rendering by any person of a decision to terminate an employment or other contractual relationship with, or otherwise penalize, a physician and surgeon principally for advocating for medically appropriate health care consistent with that degree of learning and skill ordinarily possessed by reputable physicians practicing according to the applicable legal standard of care violates the public policy of this state. No person shall terminate, retaliate against, or otherwise penalize a physician and surgeon for that advocacy, nor shall any person prohibit, restrict, or in any way discourage a physician and surgeon from communicating to a patient information in furtherance of medically appropriate health care.

(d) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a payer from making a determination not to pay for a particular medical treatment or service, or to prohibit a medical group, independent practice association, preferred provider organization, foundation, hospital medical staff, hospital governing body acting pursuant to Section 809.05, or payer from enforcing reasonable peer review or utilization review protocols or determining whether a physician has complied with those protocols.

(e) Medically appropriate health care in a hospital licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code shall be defined by the hospital medical staff and approved by the governing body, consistent with that degree of learning and skill ordinarily possessed by reputable physicians practicing according to the applicable legal standard of care.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the governing body of a hospital from taking disciplinary actions against a physician and surgeon as authorized by Sections 809.05, 809.4, and 809.5.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Medical Board of California from taking disciplinary actions against a physician and surgeon under Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220).

(h) For purposes of this section, “person” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 260, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.1.

(a) The purpose of this section is to ensure that health care service plans and their contracting entities do not enter into contracts with physicians and surgeons or other licensed health care providers that interfere with any ethical responsibility or legal right of physicians and surgeons or other licensed health care providers to discuss with their patients information relevant to their patients’ health care. It is the intent of the Legislature to guarantee that a physician and surgeon or other licensed health care provider can communicate freely with, and act as advocate for, his or her patient.

(b) Health care service plans and their contracting entities shall not include provisions in their contracts that interfere with the ability of a physician and surgeon or other licensed health care provider to communicate with a patient regarding his or her health care, including, but not limited to, communications regarding treatment options, alternative plans, or other coverage arrangements. Nothing in this section shall preclude a contract provision that provides that a physician and surgeon, or other licensed health care provider, may not solicit for alternative coverage arrangements for the primary purpose of securing financial gain.

(c) Any contractual provision inconsistent with this section shall be void and unenforceable.

(d) For purposes of this section, “licensed health care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to this division or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(e) No communication regarding treatment options shall be represented or construed to expand or revise the scope of benefits or covered services under a health care service plan or insurance contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1089, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2058.

(a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits service in the case of emergency, or the domestic administration of family remedies.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit obtaining a blood specimen by skin puncture for the purpose of performing blood glucose testing for the purposes of monitoring a minor child in accordance with paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 1241.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 550, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2060.

Nothing in this chapter applies to any practitioner located outside this state, when in actual consultation, whether within this state or across state lines, with a licensed practitioner of this state, or when an invited guest of the California Medical Association or the California Podiatric Medical Association, or one of their component county societies, or of an approved medical or podiatric medical school or college for the sole purpose of engaging in professional education through lectures, clinics, or demonstrations, if he or she is, at the time of the consultation, lecture, or demonstration a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed doctor of podiatric medicine in the state or country in which he or she resides. This practitioner shall not open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, receive calls from patients within the limits of this state, give orders, or have ultimate authority over the care or primary diagnosis of a patient who is located within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2061.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the practice of other persons licensed, certified, or registered under any other provision of law relating to the healing arts when such person is engaged in his or her authorized and licensed practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2062.

Testing and guidance programs in schools, colleges, and universities and physical fitness tests given by public and private agencies in connection with employment or issuance or renewal of licenses or permits do not constitute the practice of medicine within the meaning or intent of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2063.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to discriminate against any particular school of medicine or surgery, school or college of podiatric medicine, or any other treatment, nor shall it regulate, prohibit, or apply to any kind of treatment by prayer, nor interfere in any way with the practice of religion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a regularly matriculated student undertaking a course of professional instruction in an approved medical school, or to prevent a foreign medical student who is enrolled in an approved medical school or clinical training program in this state, from engaging in the practice of medicine whenever and wherever prescribed as a part of his or her course of study.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 24.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2064 or any other provisions of this chapter, a regularly matriculated student undertaking a course of professional instruction in a medical school approved by the American Osteopathic Association or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California is eligible for enrollment in elective clerkships or preceptorships in any medical school or clinical training program in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.2.

No medical school or clinical training program shall deny access to elective clerkships or preceptorships in any medical school or clinical training program in this state solely on the basis that a student is enrolled in an osteopathic medical school.

Any violation of this section or Section 2064.1 may be enjoined in an action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurs, upon receipt of a complaint by an aggrieved student.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.3.
